test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TR-PFV-yi_a-istsa_see_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ìstsá[see_O] :
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg2:                    [niyisʔí,niyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg3:                    [yisʔí,yisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [yisʔí,yisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       [miyisʔí,miyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg4:                    [guyisʔí,guyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàguyisʔí,dàguyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl2:                    [nihiyisʔí, nihiyisʔín, nahiyisʔí, nahiyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihiyisʔí, dànihiyisʔín, dànahiyisʔí, dànahiyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3:                    [gimiyisʔí,gimiyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgimiyisʔí,dàgimiyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [yisʔí,yisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyisʔí,dàyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjRefl:                   [idiyisʔí,idiyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjAreal:                  [guyisʔí,guyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàguyisʔí,dàguyisʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg1:                    [siyíʔí,siyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg3:                    [yíʔí,yíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [yíʔí,yíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       [miyíʔí,miyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg4:                    [guyíʔí,guyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàguyíʔí,dàguyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl1:                    [nihiyíʔí, nihiyíʔín, nahiyíʔí, nahiyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihiyíʔí, dànihiyíʔín, dànahiyíʔí, dànahiyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3:                    [gimiyíʔí,gimiyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgimiyíʔí,dàgimiyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [yíʔí,yíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyíʔí,dàyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjRefl:                   [idiyíʔí,idiyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjAreal:                  [guyíʔí,guyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàguyíʔí,dàguyíʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg1:                    [sáʔí,sáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg2:                    [náʔí,náʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg3:                    [yáʔí,yáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [yiʔí,yiʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg4:                    [gwáʔí,gwáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàgwáʔí,dàgwáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl1:                    [niháʔí, niháʔín, naháʔí, naháʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dàniháʔí, dàniháʔín, dànaháʔí, dànaháʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl2:                    [niháʔí, niháʔín, naháʔí, naháʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dàniháʔí, dàniháʔín, dànaháʔí, dànaháʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3:                    [gwáʔí,gwáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgwáʔí,dàgwáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [yiʔí,yiʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyiʔí,dàyiʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjRefl:                   [idáʔí,idáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjAreal:                  [gwáʔí,gwáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàgwáʔí,dàgwáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg1:                    [sits'áʔí,sits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg1+Distr:              [dàsits'áʔí,dàsits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg2:                    [nits'áʔí,nits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg2+Distr:              [dànits'áʔí,dànits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3:                    [ts'áʔí,ts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+Distr:              [dàts'áʔí,dàts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [ts'áʔí,ts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàts'áʔí,dàts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       [mits'áʔí,mits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic+Distr: [dàmits'áʔí,dàmits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg4:                    [guts'áʔí,guts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàguts'áʔí,dàguts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl1:                    [nihits'áʔí, nihits'áʔín, nahits'áʔí, nahits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihits'áʔí, dànihits'áʔín, dànahits'áʔí, dànahits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl2:                    [nihits'áʔí, nihits'áʔín, nahits'áʔí, nahits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihits'áʔí, dànihits'áʔín, dànahits'áʔí, dànahits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3:                    [gimits'áʔí,gimits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgimits'áʔí,dàgimits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [ts'áʔí,ts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàts'áʔí,dàts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRecip:                  [ástłits'áʔí, ástłits'áʔín, átłits'áʔí, átłits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRecip+Distr:            [daástłits'áʔí, daástłits'áʔín, daátłits'áʔí, daátłits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRefl:                   [idits'áʔí,idits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRefl+Distr:             [dààdits'áʔí,dààdits'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjAreal:                  [guts'áʔí,guts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàguts'áʔí,dàguts'áʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg2:                    [niyiìʔí, niyiìʔín, niyaàʔí, niyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg2+Distr:              [dàniyiìʔí, dàniyiìʔín, dàniyaàʔí, dàniyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3:                    [yiìʔí, yiìʔín, yaàʔí, yaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+Distr:              [dàyiìʔí, dàyiìʔín, dàyaàʔí, dàyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [yiìʔí, yiìʔín, yaàʔí, yaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyiìʔí, dàyiìʔín, dàyaàʔí, dàyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       [miyiìʔí, miyiìʔín, miyaàʔí, miyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic+Distr: [dàmiyiìʔí, dàmiyiìʔín, dàmiyaàʔí, dàmiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg4:                    [guyiìʔí, guyiìʔín, guyaàʔí, guyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàguyiìʔí, dàguyiìʔín, dàguyaàʔí, dàguyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl2:                    [nihiyiìʔí, nihiyiìʔín, nihiyaàʔí, nihiyaàʔín, nahiyiìʔí, nahiyiìʔín, nahiyaàʔí, nahiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihiyiìʔí, dànihiyiìʔín, dànihiyaàʔí, dànihiyaàʔín, dànahiyiìʔí, dànahiyiìʔín, dànahiyaàʔí, dànahiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3:                    [gimiyiìʔí, gimiyiìʔín, gimiyaàʔí, gimiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgimiyiìʔí, dàgimiyiìʔín, dàgimiyaàʔí, dàgimiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [yiìʔí, yiìʔín, yaàʔí, yaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyiìʔí, dàyiìʔín, dàyaàʔí, dàyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRecip:                  [ástłiyiìʔí, ástłiyiìʔín, ástłiyaàʔí, ástłiyaàʔín, átłiyiìʔí, átłiyiìʔín, átłiyaàʔí, átłiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRecip+Distr:            [daástłiyiìʔí, daástłiyiìʔín, daástłiyaàʔí, daástłiyaàʔín, daátłiyiìʔí, daátłiyiìʔín, daátłiyaàʔí, daátłiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRefl:                   [idiyiìʔí, idiyiìʔín, idiyaàʔí, idiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRefl+Distr:             [dààdiyiìʔí, dààdiyiìʔín, dààdiyaàʔí, dààdiyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjAreal:                  [guyiìʔí, guyiìʔín, guyaàʔí, guyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàguyiìʔí, dàguyiìʔín, dàguyaàʔí, dàguyaàʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg1:                    [siyasʔí,siyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg1+Distr:              [dàsiyasʔí,dàsiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3:                    [yasʔí,yasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+Distr:              [dàyasʔí,dàyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [yasʔí,yasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyasʔí,dàyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       [miyasʔí,miyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic+Distr: [dàmiyasʔí,dàmiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg4:                    [guyasʔí,guyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàguyasʔí,dàguyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl1:                    [nihiyasʔí, nihiyasʔín, nahiyasʔí, nahiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihiyasʔí, dànihiyasʔín, dànahiyasʔí, dànahiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3:                    [gimiyasʔí,gimiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgimiyasʔí,dàgimiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [yasʔí,yasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyasʔí,dàyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRecip:                  [ástłiyasʔí, ástłiyasʔín, átłiyasʔí, átłiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRecip+Distr:            [daástłiyasʔí, daástłiyasʔín, daátłiyasʔí, daátłiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRefl:                   [idiyasʔí,idiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRefl+Distr:             [dààdiyasʔí,dààdiyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjAreal:                  [guyasʔí,guyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàguyasʔí,dàguyasʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg1:                    [sigáʔí,sigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg1+Distr:              [dàsigáʔí,dàsigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg2:                    [nigáʔí,nigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg2+Distr:              [dànigáʔí,dànigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3:                    [giyáʔí,giyáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3+Distr:              [dàgiyáʔí,dàgiyáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [gáʔí,gáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàgáʔí,dàgáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg4:                    [gugáʔí,gugáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàgugáʔí,dàgugáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl1:                    [nihigáʔí, nihigáʔín, nahigáʔí, nahigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihigáʔí, dànihigáʔín, dànahigáʔí, dànahigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl2:                    [nihigáʔí, nihigáʔín, nahigáʔí, nahigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihigáʔí, dànihigáʔín, dànahigáʔí, dànahigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3:                    [gugáʔí,gugáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgugáʔí,dàgugáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [gáʔí,gáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàgáʔí,dàgáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRecip:                  [ástłigáʔí, ástłigáʔín, átłigáʔí, átłigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRecip+Distr:            [daástłigáʔí, daástłigáʔín, daátłigáʔí, daátłigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRefl:                   [igidáʔí, igidáʔín, idigáʔí, idigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRefl+Distr:             [dààgidáʔí, dààgidáʔín, dààdigáʔí, dààdigáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjAreal:                  [gugáʔí,gugáʔín]
    ìstsá+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàgugáʔí,dàgugáʔín]
